Utah statutes.
38-1a-104.   Owner-builder original contract -- Owner-builder as original contractor.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1)  an original contract is considered to exist between an owner-builder as owner and the owner-builder as original contractor; and

(2)  in addition to being an owner, an owner-builder is considered to be an original contractor.

